Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4168.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 16B.325, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Development of sustainable building guidelines. The Department of Administration and the Department of Commerce, with the assistance of other agencies, shall develop sustainable building design guidelines for all new state buildings by January 15, 2003, and for all major renovations of state buildings by February 1, 2009. The primary objectives of these guidelines are to ensure that all new state buildings, and major renovations of state buildings, initially exceed the state energy code, as established in Minnesota Rules, chapter 7676, by at least 30 percent.new text begin The guidelines shall not require that renewable energy sources be located on the building site.new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to any new building project for which the predesign work is completed after the day of enactment. new text end